Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-343
Sections, how construed.

Sections 42-341 to 42-344 shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate their general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact them.

Laws 1949, c. 124, § 3, p. 331.